Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Manufactured Residential Dwellings

13-24-201. Exclusion of manufactured residential dwellings prohibited — Exceptions.

Notwithstanding any provision of the law to the contrary, no power or authority granted by this code to regulate zoning or land use planning shall be used to exclude the placement of a residential dwelling on land designated for residential use solely because the dwelling is partially or completely constructed in a manufacturing facility.

“Residential dwelling,” as used in this part, does not apply to factory-manufactured mobile homes constructed as a single self-contained unit and mounted on a single chassis, and as further defined in § 68-126-202(2), (4) and [former] (7), nor shall this chapter have any effect whatsoever upon any zoning or other regulations whether state or local concerning such factory-manufactured mobile homes as herein defined.

Acts 1980, ch. 747, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former § 68-126-202(7), concerning the definition of motor homes, referred to in this section, was repealed by Acts 2005, ch. 379, § 2, effective July 1, 2005.

Attorney General Opinions. T.C.A. § 13-24-201 does not operate to preclude the placement of double-wide trailers in trailer parks, OAG 01-159, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 171 (10/25/01).

The term “manufactured residential dwelling” includes double-wide trailers, provided such dwellings have the same general appearance as site-built homes, but the term does not include single-wide trailers if such dwellings are constructed as a single self-contained unit and mounted on a single chassis, OAG 01-159, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 171 (10/25/01).

13-24-202. General appearance of manufactured residential dwellings.

Such manufactured residential dwelling shall have the same general appearance as required for site-built homes.

Acts 1980, ch. 747, § 2.